Wisconsin, session 2025, AB507.
do enact as follows:AB507,11Section 1. 20.865 (1) (dm) of the statutes is repealed.AB507,22Section 2. 20.928 (1f) of the statutes is repealed.AB507,33Section 3. 62.13 (4) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,4,11462.13 (4) (d) The examination shall be free for all U.S. citizens over 18 and 1under 55 years of age, with proper limitations as to health and, subject to ss. 2111.321, 111.322, and 111.335, arrest and conviction record. The examination, 3including minimum training and experience requirements, shall be job-related in 4compliance with appropriate validation standards and shall be subject to the 5approval of the board and may include tests of manual skill and physical strength. 6All relevant experience, whether paid or unpaid, shall satisfy experience 7requirements. The board shall control examinations and may designate and change 8examiners, who may or may not be otherwise in the official service of the city, and 9whose compensation shall be fixed by the board and paid by the city. Veterans and 10their spouses shall be given preference points in accordance with s. 63.08 (1) (fm) 11230.16 (7).AB507,412Section 4. 63.08 (1) (f) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,4,161363.08 (1) (f) 1. The commission may not impose any restriction as to age on 14any veteran who is applying or eligible for a position under this section. The 15commission shall give preference points to veterans and their spouses under par. 16(fm) s. 230.16 (7), except as provided under subd. 2.AB507,517Section 5. 63.08 (1) (f) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,4,201863.08 (1) (f) 2. Notwithstanding par. (fm) s. 230.16 (7), persons shall be 19certified from the eligible list under s. 63.05 (1) (b) without adding any preference 20points to any person’s grade.AB507,621Section 6. 63.08 (1) (f) 3. of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,5,42263.08 (1) (f) 3. After the certification under subd. 2., any veteran or veteran’s 23spouse whose grade, plus the points to which the veteran or spouse is entitled under 1par. (fm) s. 230.16 (7), is equal to or higher than the lowest grade on the list made 2under subd. 2. shall be added to the certification list under s. 63.05 (1) (b). The 3number of persons added to a certification list under this subdivision may not 4exceed the number of persons initially certified under subd. 2.AB507,75Section 7. 63.08 (1) (fm) of the statutes is renumbered 230.16 (7), and 230.16 6(7) (a) (intro.) and (b), as renumbered, are amended to read:AB507,5,117230.16 (7) (a) (intro.) A preference shall be given to those veterans and to 8those spouses of veterans specified in subd. subds. 1. a. to f. to 6. who gain 9eligibility on any competitive employment register and who do not currently hold a 10permanent appointment or have mandatory restoration rights to a permanent 11appointment to any position. A preference means the following:AB507,5,1512(b) An applicant who is certified for a position after receiving a preference 13under subd. 1. d., e., or f. par. (a) 4., 5., or 6. and who is appointed to that position 14may not obtain a preference under subd. 1. d., e., or f. par. (a) 4., 5., or 6. for any 15other civil service position for which the applicant subsequently applies.AB507,816Section 8. 63.37 of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,6,31763.37 Board to keep a register of eligibles. From the returns or reports of 18the examiners, or from the examinations made by the board, the board shall 19prepare and keep a register for each grade or class of position in the service of such 20city, of the persons whose general average standing upon examinations for such 21grade or class is not less than the minimum fixed by the rules of such board, and 22who are otherwise eligible, and such persons shall take rank upon the register as 23candidates in the order of their relative excellence as determined by examination 1without reference to priority of time of examination. The board shall impose no 2restrictions as to age in case of veterans, and veterans and their spouses shall be 3given preference points in accordance with s. 63.08 (1) (fm) 230.16 (7).AB507,94Section 9. 63.39 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,6,10563.39 (2m) Notwithstanding s. 63.08 (1) (fm) 230.16 (7), the board shall 6certify persons from the list of eligibles without adding preference points to their 7grades. After the certification under sub. (1) or (2), the board shall add to the 8certification list any veteran or veteran’s spouse whose grade, plus the points to 9which the veteran or spouse is entitled under s. 63.08 (1) (fm) 230.16 (7), is equal to 10or higher than the lowest grade on the list of eligibles.AB507,1011Section 10. 66.0509 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,7,21266.0509 (1) Any city or village may proceed under s. 61.34 (1), 62.11 (5) or 1366.0101 to establish a civil service system of selection, tenure and status, and the 14system may be made applicable to all municipal personnel except the chief 15executive and members of the governing body, members of boards and commissions 16including election officials, employees subject to s. 62.13, members of the judiciary 17and supervisors. Any town may establish a civil service system under this 18subsection. For veterans there shall be no restrictions as to age, and veterans and 19their spouses shall be given preference points in accordance with s. 63.08 (1) (fm) 20230.16 (7). The system may also include uniform provisions in respect to 21attendance, leave regulations, compensation and payrolls for all personnel included 22in the system. The governing body of any city, village or town establishing a civil 1service system under this section may exempt from the system the librarians and 2assistants subject to s. 43.09 (1).AB507,113Section 11. 230.01 (2) (bm) of the statutes is repealed.AB507,124Section 12. 230.01 (2) (bp) of the statutes is repealed.AB507,135Section 13. 230.04 (13m) of the statutes is repealed.AB507,146Section 14. 230.04 (14) of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,7,97230.04 (14) Except as provided in s. 230.445, the The administrator shall 8establish, by rule, the scope and minimum requirements of a state employee 9grievance procedure relating to conditions of employment.AB507,1510Section 15. 230.04 (19) of the statutes is repealed.AB507,1611Section 16. 230.046 (2) of the statutes is amended to read:AB507,7,2112230.046 (2) Supervisory training. After initial appointment to a 13supervisory position, each appointing authority shall ensure that each classified 14service supervisor successfully completes a supervisory development program. A 15waiver of any part of the probationary period under s. 230.28 (1) (c) may not be 16granted before completion of the development program. The program shall include 17such subjects as state personnel policies, grievance handling, discipline, 18performance evaluation, understanding the concerns of state employees with 19children, the supervisor’s role in management and the concept of the total quality 20leadership process, including quality improvement through participatory 21management.AB507,1722Section 17. 230.05 (7) of the statutes, as affected by 2023 Wisconsin Act 206, 23is amended to read:AB507,8,41230.05 (7) Except as provided in s. 230.212 (1), the director shall use 2techniques and procedures designed to certify eligible applicants to any vacant 3permanent position within 30 45 days after the filing of an appropriate request by 4an appointing authority.AB507,185Section 18. 230.05 (10) of the statutes is repealed.AB507,196Section 19. 230.06 (1) (m) of the statutes is repealed. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/ab507 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/ab507 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB507 proposaltext/2025/REG/AB507 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»AB507: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting